Washington statutes.
RCW 36.125.050

Collaborative process for ocean policy development and coastal area management.

Outer coast marine resources committees, in conjunction with their regional coordinating entity, shall meet and consult with key state, federal, local, and tribal governments, and private interest groups to develop a collaborative process to address ocean policy issues. This collaborative process should use Washington's "Ocean Action Plan: Enhancing Management of Washington State's Ocean and Outer Coasts" developed by the Washington ocean policy work group as a guide to begin the work of developing and coordinating state and local ocean policy and providing better management of Washington's coastal areas.

[ 2007 c 344 s 6.]